Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1325
State Treasurer; rules and regulations; adopt.

The State Treasurer is hereby authorized to make necessary rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of sections 69-1301 to 69-1329.

Laws 1969, c. 611, § 25, p. 2490.